Alabama, session 2026rs, SB87.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 6-2-42 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§6-2-42
(a) A civil action based on a real estate appraisal
completed by a person who is or was licensed, certified, or
registered under Chapter 27A of Title 34, on the date of the
appraisal must be commenced against the appraiser no more than
three years from a person's discovery of the act or omission
giving rise to the action but no more than five years after
the date the appraisal was completed.
(b) This section is inapplicable to any action arising
Page 1

(b) This section is inapplicable to any action arising
SB87 Engrossed
from a real estate appraisal where the real estate appraiser
fraudulently inflated the value of the property or colluded
with others to fraudulently inflate the value of the property.
Section 2. Section 34-27A-20, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§34-27A-20
(a) The board may investigate the actions of a licensed
real property appraiser on complaint or on its own motion,
and, either when a complaint is filed against the appraiser or
by initiating an investigation on its own. Based upon their
findings, the board may: (i) revoke or suspend the appraiser's
license,; (ii) levy fines as provided in subsection (c),;
(iii) require completion of education courses,; or discipline
by public and no more than iv) issue public and private
reprimands, with a limit of two private reprimands per
licensed real property appraiser for any of the following acts
or omissions:
(1) Procuring Obtaining or attempting to procure obtain
a license or certificate pursuant to this article by knowingly
making a false statement, submitting false information,
refusing to provide complete information in response to a
question in an application for a license, or through any form
of fraud or misrepresentation.
(2) Failing to meet the minimum qualifications
established by this article.
(3) Paying money other than authorized by this article
to any member or employee of the board to procure obtain a
license under this article.
Page 2

license under this article.
SB87 Engrossed
(4) A conviction, including a conviction based upon a
plea of guilty or nolo contendere, of a crime which is
substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and
duties of a person developing real estate appraisals and
communicating real estate appraisals to others, or a
conviction involving moral turpitude.
(5) An act or omission involving dishonesty, fraud, or
misrepresentation with the intent to substantially benefit the
certificate holder or another person substantially, or with
the intent to substantially injure another person.
(6) Violation of any of the standards for the
development or communication of real estate appraisals as
provided in this section.
(7) Failure or refusal without good cause to exercise
reasonable diligence in developing an appraisal, preparing an
appraisal, in preparing an appraisal report, or in
communicating an appraisal.
(8) Negligence or incompetence in developing an
appraisal, in preparing an appraisal report, or in
communicating an appraisal.
(9) Willfully disregarding or violating this article or
the regulations of the board for the administration and
enforcement of this article.
(10) Accepting an appraisal assignment, as defined in
Section 34-27A-24, when the employment itself is contingent
upon (i) the appraiser reporting a predetermined estimate,
analysis, or opinion, or (ii) where the fee to be paid is
contingent upon the opinion, conclusions, or valuation
Page 3

contingent upon the opinion, conclusions, or valuation
SB87 Engrossed
reached, or upon (iii) the consequences resulting from the
appraisal assignment.
(11) Violating the confidential nature of governmental
records to which he or she gained access through employment or
engagement as an appraiser by a governmental agency.
(12) Entry of a final civil judgment against the person
on grounds of fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit in the
making of any appraisal of real property.
(13) Presenting to the board, as payment for a fee or
fine, a check that is returned unpaid.
(14) Failing to keep for at least five years, a
complete record or file of appraisal or specialized
assignments regulated under this article, in accordance with
Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice and
Section 34-27A-26.
100 (15) Failing within a reasonable time to provide
101 information within a reasonable time or providing false
102 information in response to a request by the board during an
103 investigation or after a formal complaint has been filed.
104 (16) Failing to pay by required deadlines, fees or
105 fines levied by the board by required deadlines.
106 (17) Failing to notify the board within a reasonable
107 time of the filing of any civil action related to the
108 appraisal practice or of any criminal prosecution filed
109 against the appraiser.
110 (b) The board shall not consider a complaint for
111 disciplinary action against a real estate appraiser if the
112 complaint relates to an appraisal that was completed more than
Page 4

complaint relates to an appraisal that was completed more than
SB87 Engrossed
113 five years before the complaint was submitted.
114 (c) In a disciplinary proceeding based upon a civil
115 judgment, the real property appraiser shall be afforded an
116 opportunity allowed to present matters in mitigation and
117 extenuation, but may not collaterally attack the civil
118 judgment.
119 (c) (d) In addition to the disciplinary powers granted
120 in subsection (a), the board may levy administrative fines of
121 not more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each serious
122 violations violation of this article or the rules and
123 regulations of the board of not more than $500 for each
124 violation."
125 Section 3. This act shall become effective on June 1,
126 2026.
Page 5

2026.
SB87 Engrossed
127
128
129 Senate
130 Read for the first time and referred ................13-Jan-26
131 to the Senate committee on Judiciary
132
133 Read for the second time and placed ................03-Feb-26
134 on the calendar:
135 1 amendment
136
137 Read for the third time and passed ................24-Feb-26
138 as amended
139 Yeas 33
140 Nays 0
141 Abstains 0
142
143
144 Patrick Harris,
145 Secretary.
146
Page 6